California statutes. Penal Code
(2) The statement in paragraph (1) shall be posted on the counter of one of the main gun displays or within five feet of the cash register. In the case that posting the statement on the counter of a gun display or within five feet of the cash register is impossible, the licensed dealer shall post the statement conspicuously within the licensed premises. The statement shall not be placed on the floor or the ceiling of the premises.

(3) The word “WARNING” in paragraph (1) shall be on a separate line above the other text in the statement.

(4) The sentence “IF YOU OR A LOVED ONE IS EXPERIENCING DISTRESS OR DEPRESSION OR IS CONTEMPLATING SUICIDE, PLEASE CALL 988 (THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE).” in paragraph (1) shall be on a separate line below “WARNING” and above the other text in the statement.

(c) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 14.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative April 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26840.

(a) A dealer shall not deliver a firearm unless the person receiving the firearm presents to the dealer a valid firearm safety certificate, or, in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate. The firearms dealer shall retain a photocopy of the firearm safety certificate as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 4.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26845.

(a) No handgun may be delivered unless the purchaser, transferee, or person being loaned the firearm presents documentation indicating that the person is a California resident.

(b) Satisfactory documentation shall include a utility bill from within the last three months, a residential lease, a property deed, or military permanent duty station
 orders indicating assignment within this state, or other evidence of residency as permitted by the Department of Justice.

(c) The firearms dealer shall retain a photocopy of the documentation as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 10.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26850.

(a) Except as authorized by the department, no firearms dealer may deliver a handgun unless the recipient performs a safe handling demonstration with that handgun.

(b) The safe handling demonstration shall commence with the handgun unloaded and locked with the firearm safety device with which it is required to be delivered, if applicable.
 While maintaining muzzle awareness, that is, the firearm is pointed in a safe direction, preferably down at the ground, and trigger discipline, that is, the trigger finger is outside of the trigger guard and along side of the handgun frame, at all times, the handgun recipient shall correctly and safely perform the following:

(1) If the handgun is a semiautomatic pistol, the steps listed in Section 26853.

(2) If the handgun is a double-action revolver, the steps listed in Section 26856.

(3) If the handgun is a single-action revolver, the steps listed in Section 26859.

(c) The recipient shall receive instruction regarding how to render that handgun safe in the event of a jam.

(d) The
 firearms dealer shall sign and date an affidavit stating that the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) have been met. The firearms dealer shall additionally obtain the signature of the handgun purchaser on the same affidavit. The firearms dealer shall retain the original affidavit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(e) The recipient shall perform the safe handling demonstration for a department-certified instructor.

(f) No demonstration shall be required if the dealer is returning the handgun to the owner of the handgun.

(g) Department-certified instructors who may administer the safe handling demonstration shall meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 31635.

(h) The persons who are exempt from the requirements of
 subdivision (a) of Section 31615, pursuant to Section 31700, are also exempt from performing the safe handling demonstration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 11.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26853.

To comply with Section 26850, a safe handling demonstration for a semiautomatic pistol shall include all of the following steps:

(a) Remove the magazine.

(b) Lock the slide back. If the model of firearm does not allow the slide to be locked back, pull the slide back, visually and physically check the chamber to ensure that it is
 clear.

(c) Visually and physically inspect the chamber, to ensure that the handgun is unloaded.

(d) Remove the firearm safety device, if applicable. If the firearm safety device prevents any of the previous steps, remove the firearm safety device during the appropriate step.

(e) Load one bright orange, red, or other readily identifiable dummy round into the magazine. If no readily identifiable dummy round is available, an empty cartridge casing with an empty primer pocket may be used.

(f) Insert the magazine into the magazine well of the firearm.

(g) Manipulate the slide release or pull back and release the slide.

(h) Remove
 the magazine.

(i) Visually inspect the chamber to reveal that a round can be chambered with the magazine removed.

(j) Lock the slide back to eject the bright orange, red, or other readily identifiable dummy round. If the handgun is of a model that does not allow the slide to be locked back, pull the slide back and physically check the chamber to ensure that the chamber is clear. If no readily identifiable dummy round is available, an empty cartridge casing with an empty primer pocket may be used.

(k) Apply the safety, if applicable.

(l) Apply the firearm safety device, if applicable. This requirement shall not apply to an Olympic competition pistol if no firearm safety device, other than a cable lock that the department has determined would damage the
 barrel of the pistol, has been approved for the pistol, and the pistol is either listed in subdivision (b) of Section 32105 or is subject to subdivision (c) of Section 32105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26856.

To comply with Section 26850, a safe handling demonstration for a double-action revolver shall include all of the following steps:

(a) Open the cylinder.

(b) Visually and physically inspect each chamber, to ensure that the revolver is unloaded.

(c) Remove the firearm
 safety device. If the firearm safety device prevents any of the previous steps, remove the firearm safety device during the appropriate step.

(d) While maintaining muzzle awareness and trigger discipline, load one bright orange, red, or other readily identifiable dummy round into a chamber of the cylinder and rotate the cylinder so that the round is in the next-to-fire position. If no readily identifiable dummy round is available, an empty cartridge casing with an empty primer pocket may be used.

(e) Close the cylinder.

(f) Open the cylinder and eject the round.

(g) Visually and physically inspect each chamber to ensure that the revolver is unloaded.

(h) Apply the firearm safety device, if
 applicable. This requirement shall not apply to an Olympic competition pistol if no firearm safety device, other than a cable lock that the department has determined would damage the barrel of the pistol, has been approved for the pistol, and the pistol is either listed in subdivision (b) of Section 32105 or is subject to subdivision (c) of Section 32105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26859.

To comply with Section 26850, a safe handling demonstration for a single-action revolver shall include all of the following steps:

(a) Open the loading gate.

(b) Visually and physically inspect each chamber, to ensure that the revolver is unloaded.

(c) Remove the firearm
 safety device required to be sold with the handgun. If the firearm safety device prevents any of the previous steps, remove the firearm safety device during the appropriate step.

(d) Load one bright orange, red, or other readily identifiable dummy round into a chamber of the cylinder, close the loading gate and rotate the cylinder so that the round is in the next-to-fire position. If no readily identifiable dummy round is available, an empty cartridge casing with an empty primer pocket may be used.

(e) Open the loading gate and unload the revolver.

(f) Visually and physically inspect each chamber to ensure that the revolver is unloaded.

(g) Apply the firearm safety device, if applicable. This requirement shall not apply to an Olympic competition pistol
 if no firearm safety device, other than a cable lock that the department has determined would damage the barrel of the pistol, has been approved for the pistol, and the pistol is either listed in subdivision (b) of Section 32105 or is subject to subdivision (c) of Section 32105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26860.

(a) Except as authorized by the department, commencing January 1, 2015, a firearms dealer shall not deliver a long gun unless the recipient performs a safe handling demonstration with that long gun.

(b) The department shall, not later than January 1, 2015, adopt regulations establishing a long gun safe handling demonstration that shall include, at a minimum, loading and unloading the long gun.

(c) The firearms dealer shall sign and date an affidavit stating that the requirements of subdivision (a) and the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) have been met. The firearms dealer shall
 additionally obtain the signature of the long gun purchaser on the same affidavit. The firearms dealer shall retain the original affidavit as proof of compliance with this section.

(d) The recipient shall perform the safe handling demonstration for a department-certified instructor.

(e) A demonstration is not required if the dealer is returning the long gun to the owner of the long gun.

(f) Department-certified instructors who may administer the safe handling demonstration shall meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 31635.

(g) An individual who is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 31615, pursuant to Section 31700, is also
 exempt from performing the safe handling demonstration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 5.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

26865.

A licensee shall offer to provide the purchaser or transferee of a firearm, or person being loaned a firearm, with a copy of the pamphlet described in Section 34205, and may add the cost of the pamphlet, if any, to the sales price of the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 12.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26866.

(a) A licensee shall provide the purchaser or transferee of a firearm, or person being loaned a firearm, with a copy of the most current version of the pamphlet described in Section 34210 as found on the department’s internet website in PDF or another imaging format at the start of the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540.

(b) A licensee may add the cost of the pamphlet, if any, to the price of the firearm.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26870.

A licensee shall not commit an act of collusion as defined in Section 27550.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26875.

A licensee shall post conspicuously within the licensed premises a detailed list of each of the following:

(a) All charges required by governmental agencies for processing firearm transfers required by Section 12806, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200) of Chapter 6.

(b) All fees that
 the licensee charges pursuant to Section 12806 and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26880.

A licensee shall not misstate the amount of fees charged by a governmental agency pursuant to Section 12806, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26883.

(a) A licensee shall not charge a restocking or other return-related fee of more than 5 percent of the purchase price of the firearm if the buyer decides to cancel the purchase of the firearm during the 10-day period imposed pursuant to Section 26815. 

(b) This section shall not apply to a special order firearm by the buyer. 

(c) For purposes of this section, “special order” means a specific request by the buyer for the licensee to order a firearm that is not available to the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   (AB 1842)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26885.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 26805, all firearms that are in the inventory of a licensee shall be kept within the licensed location.

(b) Within 48 hours of discovery, a licensee shall report the loss or theft of any of the following items to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the city, county, or city and county where the licensee’s business premises are located:

(1) Any firearm or ammunition that is merchandise of the licensee.

(2) Any firearm or ammunition that the licensee takes possession of pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 28050), or pursuant to Section
 30312.

(3) Any firearm or ammunition kept at the licensee’s place of business.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 7.1.)
-------------------------------------------

26890.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 26805, any time when the licensee is not open for business, all inventory firearms shall be stored in the licensed location. All firearms shall be secured using one of the following methods as to each particular firearm:

(1) Store the firearm in a secure facility that is a part of, or that constitutes, the licensee’s business premises.

(2) Secure the firearm with a hardened steel rod or cable of at least one-eighth inch in diameter through the trigger guard of the firearm. The steel rod or cable shall be secured with a hardened steel lock that has a shackle. The lock and shackle shall be protected or shielded from the use of a boltcutter and
 the rod or cable shall be anchored in a manner that prevents the removal of the firearm from the premises.

(3) Store the firearm in a locked fireproof safe or vault in the licensee’s business premises.

(b) The licensing authority in an unincorporated area of a county or within a city may impose security requirements that are more strict or are at a higher standard than those specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Upon written request from a licensee, the licensing authority may grant an exemption from compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a) if the licensee is unable to comply with those requirements because of local ordinances, covenants, lease conditions, or similar circumstances not under the control of the licensee.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and
 (b) shall not apply to a licensee organized as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or as a mutual benefit corporation pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation obtained the dealer’s license solely and exclusively to assist that corporation or local chapters of that corporation in conducting auctions, raffles, or similar events at which firearms are auctioned or raffled off to fund the activities of that corporation or the local chapters of the corporation.

(2) The firearms are not handguns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 17.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26892.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a licensee shall accept a firearm for storage from an individual if all of the following conditions are met: 

(1) The firearm is voluntarily and temporarily transferred to the licensee for safekeeping to prevent it from being accessed or used by the transferor or
 other persons that may gain access to it in the transferor’s household, causing significant danger of personal injury to themselves or others.

(2) The licensee does not use the firearm for any purpose, except storage.

(3) The duration of the loan is limited to that amount of time reasonably necessary to prevent the harm described in paragraph (1).

(b) (1) A licensee may accept a firearm for storage from an individual for a purpose that is not unlawful that is not otherwise set forth in subdivision (a) or Section 29830.

(2) A licensee who accepts a firearm for storage pursuant to this subdivision is not to use
 the firearm for any purpose other than storage.

(c) A firearm that is returned by a dealer to the owner of the firearm pursuant to this section shall be returned in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 27540 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6.

(d) If the dealer cannot legally return the firearm to the transferor or person loaning the firearm, then the following procedure shall apply:

(1) The transferor or person loaning the firearm may request, and the dealer shall grant, that the dealer retain possession of the firearm for a period of up to 45 days so that the transferor or the person loaning the firearm may designate
 a person to take possession of that firearm in accordance with Section 27540. This 45-day period shall be in addition to the waiting period described in Sections 26815 and 27540, and any time necessary to process a transaction.

(2) If, before the end of the 45-day period, the transferor or person loaning the firearm designates a person to receive the firearm and that person completes an application to purchase, the dealer shall process the transaction in accordance with the provisions of Section 27540.

(3) If the transferor or person loaning the firearm, does not request that the firearm be held by the dealer pursuant to this subdivision, the firearm cannot be delivered to the designated person, or the 45-day period expires without action by the person loaning the
 firearm, the dealer, shall forthwith deliver the firearm to the sheriff of the county or the chief of police or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county, where the dealership is located, who shall then dispose of the firearm in the manner provided by Sections 18000, 18005, and 34000.

(e) (1) A dealer who takes possession of a firearm pursuant to this section shall within 48 hours of taking possession of the firearm, notify the Department of Justice in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(2) If a dealer retains possession of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (d), the dealer shall within 72 hours after retaining possession of the firearm, notify the Department of Justice in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(f) A licensee may charge a reasonable fee for the storage of the firearm pursuant to this section. The fee for storage shall be the same fee as the fee charged for storage of a firearm pursuant to Section 29830.

(g) (1) Subdivision (a) applies only to a licensee that operates a retail premises open to the general public that sells firearms.

(2) A licensee that sells only handguns is not required to accept any long gun
 for storage, and any licensee that sells only long guns is not required to accept any handgun for storage.

(3) No licensee is required to store more than 20 firearms per calendar year pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 251, Sec. 7.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26894.

(a) A licensee shall not offer an opportunity to win an item of inventory in a game dominated by chance.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a raffle conducted by a licensee organized as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or as a mutual benefit corporation pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, if the nonprofit public benefit or mutual benefit corporation obtained the dealer’s license solely and exclusively to assist that corporation or local chapters of that corporation in conducting auctions, raffles,
 or similar events at which firearms are auctioned or raffled off to fund the activities of that corporation or the local chapters of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 251, Sec. 8.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26895.

Commencing January 1, 1994, a licensee shall, upon the issuance or renewal of a license, submit a copy of it to the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26900.

(a) A licensee shall maintain and make available for inspection during business hours to any peace officer, authorized local law enforcement employee, or Department of Justice employee designated by the Attorney General, upon the presentation of proper identification, a firearm transaction record, as defined in Section 16550.

(b) A licensee shall be in compliance with the
 provisions of subdivision (a) if the licensee maintains and makes available for inspection during business hours to any peace officer, authorized local law enforcement employee, or Department of Justice employee designated by the Attorney General, upon the presentation of proper identification, the bound book containing the same information referred to in Section 478.124a and subdivision (e) of Section 478.125 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the records referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 478.124 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26905.

(a) On the date of receipt, a licensee shall report to the Department of Justice, in a format prescribed by the department, the acquisition by the licensee of the ownership of a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, of any firearm.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any of the following transactions:

(1) A transaction subject to the provisions of Sections 26960 and 27660.

(2) The dealer acquired the firearm from a wholesaler.

(3) The dealer acquired the firearm from a person who is licensed as a manufacturer or importer to engage in those activities pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(4) The dealer acquired the firearm from a person who resides outside this state who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto.

 (5) The dealer is also licensed as a secondhand dealer pursuant to Article 4
 (commencing with Section 21625) of Chapter 9 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, acquires a handgun, and, commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, and reports its acquisition pursuant to Section 21628.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 14.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26910.

A licensee shall forward, in a format prescribed by the Department of Justice, information as required by the department on any firearm that is not delivered within the time period set forth in Section 478.102(c) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26915.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2018, a firearms dealer shall require any agent or employee who handles, sells, or delivers firearms to obtain and provide to the dealer a certificate of eligibility from the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710. On the application for the certificate, the agent or employee shall provide the name and California firearms dealer number of the firearms dealer with whom the person is employed.

(b) The department shall notify the firearms dealer in the event that the agent or employee who has a certificate of eligibility is or becomes prohibited from possessing firearms.

(c) If the local jurisdiction requires a background check of the agents or
 employees of a firearms dealer, the agent or employee shall obtain a certificate of eligibility pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a local jurisdiction from conducting an additional background check pursuant to Section 11105. The local jurisdiction may not charge a fee for the additional criminal history check.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a local jurisdiction from prohibiting employment based on criminal history that does not appear as part of obtaining a certificate of eligibility.

(e) The licensee shall prohibit any agent who the licensee knows or reasonably should know is within a class of persons prohibited from possessing firearms pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, from coming into contact with any firearm that is not secured and from accessing any key, combination, code, or other means to open any of the locking devices described in subdivision (g).

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing a local government from enacting an ordinance imposing additional conditions on licensees with regard to agents or employees.

(g) For purposes of this article, “secured” means a firearm that is made inoperable in one or more of the following ways:

(1) The firearm is inoperable because it is secured by a firearm safety device listed on the department’s roster of approved firearm safety devices pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 23655.

(2) The firearm is stored in a locked gun safe or long-gun safe that meets the standards for department-approved gun safes set forth in Section 23650.

(3) The firearm is stored in a distinct locked room or area in the building that is used to store firearms, which can only be unlocked by a key, a combination, or similar means.

(4) The firearm is secured with a hardened steel rod or cable that is at least one-eighth of an inch in diameter through the trigger guard of the firearm. The steel rod or cable shall be secured with a hardened steel lock that has a shackle. The lock and shackle shall be protected or shielded from the use of a boltcutter and the rod or cable shall be anchored in a manner that prevents the removal of the firearm from the premises.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 7.2.)
-------------------------------------------

26920.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2026, every licensee, and every employee thereof who handles or processes the sale, loan, or transfer of firearms or ammunition in the course of their normal duties, shall annually complete the training and certification described in subdivision (c).

(b) Every licensee shall maintain records of certification for all employees on the business premises and shall make these records available to any agent of the department or a licensing authority conducting an inspection of
 the licensee’s premises.

(c) (1) The department shall, by no later than February 1, 2026, develop and implement a course of training for licensees and their employees who handle or process the sale, loan, or transfer of firearms or ammunition in the course of their normal duties.

(2) The training described in paragraph (1) shall include, without limitation, all of the following:

(A) Federal and state laws governing sales and transfers of firearms and ammunition.

(B) How to recognize and identify straw purchasers and fraudulent activity.

(C) Indicators that a person is attempting to purchase a firearm illegally.

(D) How to recognize and identify indicators that an individual intends to use a firearm for unlawful purposes.

(E) How to recognize and identify indicators that an individual intends to use a firearm for self-harm.

(F) How to prevent theft or burglary of firearms and ammunition.

(G) How to respond to circumstances described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, and any applicable reporting requirement.

(H) How to teach consumers rules of firearm safety, including, but not limited to, the safe handling and storage of firearms.

(I) How to accurately and precisely complete all state and federal forms related to the sale of firearms, firearms accessories, and ammunition.

(J) Other reasonable business practices that the department determines will deter gun trafficking or the unlawful use of firearms.

(3) The training shall include an examination with not fewer than 20 questions derived from the course materials and intended to confirm that a course participant has learned the information covered by the course. A participant that answers at least 70 percent of the examination questions correctly shall receive a certificate of completion valid for one year from the date of completion.

(4) In addition to the training course, the department shall prepare supplemental written materials that shall be available to all course participants and shall include, without limitation, all of the following:

(A) An outline of indicators that a prospective firearm transferee may be involved in gun trafficking or straw purchasing, including
 all of the following:

(i) The person is accompanied by one or more individuals.

(ii) The person is communicating with other individuals by telephone or other means.

(iii) The person is buying multiple firearms.

(iv) The person has been the subject of a crime gun trace.

(v) The person has purchased a firearm in the preceding 30 days.

(vi) The person otherwise indicates that a firearm is being obtained for another person.

(B) How to ascertain whether a prospective firearm purchaser is
 lawfully purchasing a firearm, including by asking questions of the prospective firearm purchaser.

(C) How to report a suspected fraudulent firearm purchase to the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives and to the Department of Justice.

(5) The department shall regularly review the training materials and update them as necessary.

(d) The department may adopt regulations for the purpose of implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   (SB 241)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions Extending Only to Waiting Period [26950. - 26970.]

26950.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 26815 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to any person who satisfies both of the following requirements:

(1) The person is properly identified as a full-time paid peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) The officer’s employer has authorized the officer to carry firearms while in the performance of duties.

(b) (1) Proper identification is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by
 which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the purchaser or transferee as a peace officer who is authorized to carry firearms while in the performance of duties, and authorizing the purchase or transfer.

(2) The certification shall be delivered to the dealer at the time of purchase or transfer and the purchaser or transferee shall identify himself or herself as the person authorized in the certification.

(3) The dealer shall keep the certification with the record of sale.

(4) On the date that the sale, delivery, or transfer is made, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the transaction as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26960.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 26815 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, a firearm that is not a handgun, by a dealer in either of the following situations:

(1) The dealer is delivering the firearm to another dealer, the firearm is not intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business, and the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) are satisfied.

(2) The dealer is delivering the firearm to himself or herself, the firearm is not intended as merchandise in the dealer’s business, and the requirements of subdivision (c) are satisfied.

(b) If the dealer is receiving the firearm from another dealer, the dealer receiving the firearm shall present proof to the dealer delivering the firearm that the receiving dealer is licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800). This shall be done by complying with Section 27555.

(c) (1) Regardless of whether the dealer is selling, delivering, or transferring the firearm to another dealer or to himself or herself, on the date that the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall forward by prepaid mail to the Department of Justice a report of the application and the type of information concerning the purchaser or transferee as is indicated in Section 28160.

(2) Where electronic or telephonic transfer of
 applicant information is used, on the date that the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit an electronic or telephonic report of the application and the type of information concerning the purchaser or transferee as is indicated in Section 28160.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 16.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26965.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 26815 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm to the holder of a special weapons permit issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 32650 or 33300, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.

(b) On the date that the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the application as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 17.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

26970.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 26815 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(2) The sale, delivery, loan, or transfer is made by a dealer.

(3) The sale, delivery, loan, or transfer is made to a person who is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations
 issued pursuant thereto.

(4) The licensed collector has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(b) On the date that the sale, delivery, or transfer is made, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the transaction as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exceptions Extending Only to Grounds for Forfeiture of License [27000. - 27005.]

27000.

(a) Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is unloaded.

(2) The loan is made by a dealer.

(3) The loan is made to a person who possesses a valid entertainment firearms permit issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8.

(4) The firearm is loaned solely for use as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or
 event.

(b) The dealer shall retain a photocopy of the entertainment firearms permit as proof of compliance with this requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27005.

(a) Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) does not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm to a consultant-evaluator by a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, if the loan does not exceed 45 days from the date of delivery.

(b) At the time of the loan, the consultant-evaluator shall provide the following information, which the dealer shall retain for two years:

(1) A photocopy of a valid, current, government-issued identification to determine the consultant-evaluator’s identity, including, but not limited to, a California driver’s license, identification card, or passport.

(2) A photocopy of the consultant-evaluator’s valid, current certificate of eligibility.
